Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1548
County attorney; prosecute violations; suspension of sentence or judgment; when.

Except as provided in subdivision (2) of section 84-205, the county attorney of any county in this state shall prosecute all complaints which may be made of violations of the Election Act to final judgment. The court before which any conviction for such violation shall be had shall not in any case suspend sentence or judgment for more than twenty days, except that no indictment or information for such violation shall be brought to trial unless the complainant, if he or she is found, has had at least two days' notice, in writing, from the county attorney of the day when he or she intends to try the same.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 447;

Laws 1997, LB 758, § 2.